Virginia statutes. Title 42.1. Libraries.
Article 5. Networking.

§ 42.1-32.1.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

1983, c. 537Former § 42.1–32.1 regarding declaration of intent was derived from 1983, c. 537.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.2.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

1983, c. 537Former § 42.1–32.2 regarding grants for establishment of library network was derived from 1983, c. 537.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.3.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

1983, c. 537Former § 42.1–32.3 regarding standards for networking was derived from 1983, c. 537.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.4.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

1983, c. 537Former § 42.1–32.4 regarding computer programs and data bases property of the commonwealth was derived from 1983, c. 537.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.5.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

1983, c. 537Former § 42.1–32.5 regarding board to establish standards for grants was derived from 1983, c. 537.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.6.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

1983, c. 537Former § 42.1–32.6 regarding establishment and operation of communication centers and other networking services was derived from 1983, c. 537.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.7.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 176.